Oklahoma, session 2025, SB460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 801.5, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 801.5. A. The Legislature declares that it is in the
public interest to promote natural gas energy development in order
to take advantage of our state’s vast natural gas resources and its
compatibility with wind energy.
B. It is further declared the intent of the Legislature to
promote natural gas energy development in this state by establishing
a natural gas energy standard to increase the use of natural gas as
an electricity generation fuel.
C. There is hereby established a natural gas energy standard to
supplement the increased volume of renewable energy and to
capitalize on the state’s abundant natural gas resources. The
natural gas energy standard shall be achieved by declaring natural
gas as the preferred choice of electric generation for new fossil
fuel generating facilities in this state after the effective date of
this act through January 1, 2020.

D. Beginning January 1, 2011, through January 1, 2020, it It is
the intent of the state that new fossil fuel generating facilities
and added capacity to existing fossil fuel generating facilities
built in this state be powered by natural gas. Any electricity
generating entity in the state choosing a fossil fuel source other
than natural gas may provide evidence to the Corporation Commission,
or other appropriate regulatory body of those entities not regulated
by the Commission, that the fossil fuel source chosen by such entity
is in the best interest of this state’s electric consumers.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 460 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 23rd day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 460 Page 3